Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 2. Reports, Investigations
andHearings

Cross references. —

As to penalty for members of commission divulging information coming to his knowledge respecting an inspection, examination or investigation, see §

37-12-207

.

§ 37-2-201.
Fixing time and place of public hearing; notice and conduct.

Whenever the commission shall determine to conduct an investigation of any matter provided for in W.S.

37-1-101

through

37-3-114

and

37-12-201

through

37-12-213

, either with or without complaint as in such chapter provided for, it shall fix a time and place for a public hearing of the matters under investigation, and shall notify, by registered letter requiring receipt, the complainant, the persons complained of and such other persons, as it may deem proper, of such time and place of hearing, at least twenty (20) days in advance thereof. At the hearing held pursuant to such notice, the commission, commissioner or commission employee authorized by order of the commission to conduct such hearing, may take such testimony as may be offered, or as they may desire, and may make such other and further investigation as in its opinion, is desirable.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 42; 1917, ch. 74, § 8; C.S. 1920, § 5494; R.S. 1931, § 94-142; C.S. 1945, § 64-301; Laws 1947, ch. 36, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 37-27; 2012, ch. 84, § 201.

Cross references. —

For authority of single commissioner or employee of the commission acting in the capacity of a hearing officer to conduct investigations and hearings, see §

37-2-102

.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “W.S.

37-1-101

through

37-3-114

and

37-12-201

through

37-12-213

” for “chapter 64, Wyoming Compiled Statutes, 1945.”

Editor's notes. —

For disposition in this compilation of the sections in ch. 64, C.S. 1945, referred to in this section, see the listings for §§ 64-101 to 64-414, C.S. 1945, in the Tables of Comparative Sections in Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Rulings should be by commissioner. —

All rulings in hearings before single commissioner should be made by commissioner only. Gore v. John, 61 Wyo. 246, 157 P.2d 552,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1945).

But objection to ruling by another is required. —

Hearing held before 1 public utilities commissioner and before manager of transportation department, with latter making the various rulings, was not vitiated as being without authority where no objection was raised at hearing to manager's so acting. Gore v. John, 61 Wyo. 246, 157 P.2d 552,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1945).

§ 37-2-202.
Service of notice.

Service on any person of any notice or order or other matter under the provisions of this act may be made by mailing such notice, or order or other matter, or a certified copy thereof, in a registered letter requiring receipt, directed to the public utility at the principal office of such public utility in this state.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 43; C.S. 1920, § 5495; R.S. 1931, § 94-143; C.S. 1945, § 64-302; W.S. 1957, § 37-28.

Cross references. —

As to service of process generally, see §

37-2-220

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See note at §

37-2-110

.

§ 37-2-203.
Separate hearings; hearings to be open; representation by attorney; reports, investigations.

When complaint is made of more than one matter or thing the commission may order separate hearings thereon and may hear and determine the several matters complained of separately and at such times as it may prescribe. All hearings conducted by the commission or commissioner shall be open to the public. In any hearing, proceeding or investigation conducted by the commission or commissioner, any party may be heard in person or by attorney.

Within a time to be fixed by the commission, every public utility under the jurisdiction of this commission shall file an annual report with the commission, verified by the oath of the president, treasurer or general manager or receiver, if any, of such public utility, or by the person required to file the same. The verification shall be made by said official holding office, at the time of the filing of said report, and, if not made upon the knowledge of the person verifying the same, shall set forth the source of his information and the grounds of his beliefs as to any matters not stated to be verified upon his knowledge. The commission shall prescribe the form of such reports and the character of the information to be contained therein, and may from time to time make such changes and such additions in regard to form and contents thereof as it may deem proper and each year shall furnish a blank form for such annual reports to every such public utility. Such report shall also cover the period, and be filed at the time prescribed by the commission. The contents of such report and the form thereof shall conform in the case of interstate public utilities as nearly as may be to that required of interstate public utilities under the act of congress entitled “An act to regulate commerce”, approved February fourth, eighteen hundred and eighty-seven [1887], and the acts amendatory thereof and supplemental thereto. The originals of said reports subscribed and sworn to as prescribed by law, shall be filed in the office of the commission. The commission may require, by order of any public utility or person, specific answers to questions upon which the commission may need information. If any public utility shall fail to make and file its annual report within the time ordered, or the time extended by the commission, it shall be subject to the penalty as provided for under W.S.

37-12-204

.

The commission shall, within its jurisdiction, have power, in its discretion, to prescribe uniform methods of keeping accounts, records and books, to be observed by all public utilities operating within the state. It may also in its discretion prescribe by order, forms of accounts, records and memoranda to be kept by such public utilities. Notice of alterations by the commission in the required method or form of keeping a system of accounts shall be given to such public utility by the commission at least six (6) months before the same shall take effect. Any other and additional forms of accounts, records and memoranda kept by such public utility shall be subject to examination by the commission. The system of accounts, established by the commission and the forms of accounts, records and memoranda prescribed by it shall in the case of interstate public utilities conform as nearly as may be to those prescribed by the surface transportation board under the act of congress, entitled “An act to regulate commerce”, and the acts amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto.

Every public utility shall report to the commission, under rules and regulations prescribed by the commission and harmonizing insofar as practicable with those of the surface transportation board, and of any other department of this state, every accident occurring upon the property of any public utility or directly or indirectly arising from or connected with the maintenance or operation of the plant, equipment, appliances, apparatus, property or facilities of such public utility resulting in loss of life or injury to person or property; provided, that whenever any accident occasions the loss of life or limb to any person, such public utility shall straightway advise the commission of the fact by the speediest available means of communication.

The commission shall investigate the cause of all such accidents resulting in loss of life or injury to persons or property, as in the judgment of the commission requires investigation by it, and the commission shall have power to make such order with respect thereto, as it may deem just and reasonable.

Nothing in this act in relation to service regulation or in relation to reports or the methods of keeping accounts, records or books shall apply to any common carrier engaged in interstate commerce; provided, that, the department of transportation may, upon proper notice, require any common carrier to furnish to the department of transportation copies of any reports as it may designate which any common carrier may have filed with the surface transportation board.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 44; 1917, ch. 74, § 9; C.S. 1920, § 5496; R.S. 1931, § 94-144; C.S. 1945, § 64-303; W.S. 1957, § 37-29; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2012, ch. 84, §§ 103, 201.

Cross references. —

As to penalty for false reports, see §

37-12-205

.

For constitutional right of an accused to defend in person and by counsel, see art. 1, § 10, Wyo. Const.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “W.S.

37-12-204

” for “section 68 of this act” in (b); and substituted “surface transportation board” for “interstate commerce commission” in (c), (d) and (f).

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See note at §

37-2-110

.

Interstate Commerce Act. —

The federal Interstate Commerce Act of February 4, 1887 (“An act to regulate commerce”), referred to in the fifth sentence in subsection (b) and in the last sentence in subsection (c), appeared as 49 U.S.C. §§ 1 through 27 before being repealed in 1978. See, now, 49 U.S.C. §§ 10101 et seq.

Stated

in

Northern Utils., Inc. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 617 P.2d 1079,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 37-2-204.
Rules for proceedings and investigations.

The commission may from time to time make, publish or amend rules for the order and regulation of all proceedings and investigations which under the provisions of this act it is authorized to conduct.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 41; C.S. 1920, § 5493; R.S. 1931, § 94-141; C.S. 1945, § 64-215; W.S. 1957, § 37-30.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See note at §

37-2-110

.

§ 37-2-205.
Certificate of convenience and necessity; hearings.

Except as provided in this subsection, no public utility shall begin construction or complete the purchase of a line or plant, or of any extension of a line or material addition to a plant, without having first obtained from the commission a certificate that the present or future public convenience and necessity require or will require such construction or purchase. This act shall not be construed to require any public utility operating outside of a city or town to secure a certificate for an extension into an area within which it has lawfully commenced operation, or for an extension into territory contiguous to its line or plant for which no certificate is in force and is not served by a public utility of like character or for any extension within or to territory already served by it, necessary in the ordinary course of its business. If any public utility, in constructing or extending its line or plant interferes or is about to interfere with the operation of the line or plant of any other public utility already authorized or constructed, the commission on complaint of the public utility claiming to be injuriously affected, may after hearing make such order and prescribe the terms and conditions for the location of the lines or plants affected, as to it are just and reasonable. The power companies may, without the certificate, increase capacity of existing plants. For purposes of this subsection, “material addition” shall not include an addition to a plant that is necessary to serve load growth, provided that the capital investment in the addition shall not exceed one percent (1%) of the total capital investment in the plant on which return is earned, that is assigned or allocated to Wyoming customers, based on the public utility’s most recent rate case determination.

No public utility shall henceforth exercise any right or privilege or obtain a franchise or permit to exercise such right or privilege from a municipality or county, without having first obtained from the commission a certificate that public convenience and necessity require the exercise of such right and privilege; provided, that when the commission shall find, after hearing, that a public utility has heretofore begun actual construction work and is prosecuting such work in good faith, uninterruptedly and with reasonable diligence in proportion to the magnitude of the undertaking, under any franchise or permit heretofore granted but not heretofore actually exercised, such public utility may proceed to the completion of such work, and may, after such completion exercise such right or privilege; and provided, further, that this section shall not be construed to validate any right or privilege now invalid or hereafter becoming invalid under any law of this state, nor impair any vested right in any franchise or permit heretofore granted.

Before any certificate may issue, under this section, a certified copy of its articles of incorporation or charter, if the applicant be a corporation, shall be filed in the office of the commission. The commission shall have power, after hearing involving the financial ability and good faith of the applicant and the necessity of additional service in the community, to issue said certificate, as prayed for, or to refuse to issue the same, or to issue to it for the construction of a portion only of the contemplated line, plant, or system, or of a portion only, of the contemplated line, plant, system or extension thereof, or for the partial exercise only of said right or privilege, and may attach to the exercise of the rights granted by said certificate such terms and conditions as in its judgment the public convenience and necessity may require.

Upon its own motion, or on complaint of any person the commission shall have power to investigate and determine whether the competitive rates, charges and service existing between any public utilities are fair, just and reasonable, after hearing thereon to determine, fix and order such rates, charges, regulations and remedies as will establish reasonable and just rates, between said competing public utilities, and between said public utilities and their customers and patrons.

Where a certificate for the construction and operation of a high voltage electric transmission line of 230 KV or greater is required, the public service commission shall publish notice of application in a newspaper of general circulation in each county where the line will be constructed. The public service commission shall give actual notice of hearing on the application by registered mail at the applicant’s expense to each landowner who may be affected. The notice of hearing shall be given at least thirty (30) days before the hearing is held and shall contain a summary of the pertinent facts about the application.

In the case of a certificate for the construction of a high voltage electric transmission line of 230 KV or greater, the issuance of the certificate shall be conditioned so that no construction of the line is authorized until all right-of-way for the line has been acquired.

Any electric utility which provided service to any part of the annexed area prior to annexation and which does not receive a franchise from the annexing municipality to serve the annexed area shall receive just compensation from the public or private utility franchised to serve the annexed area. If the affected utilities cannot agree on just compensation within thirty (30) days after the franchise has been issued and become final after any challenge thereto, the affected utilities shall submit the matter to arbitration before the public service commission pursuant to W.S.

37-2-113

. Upon conclusion of the arbitration proceedings and payment of the compensation determined to be just, ownership of the facilities shall be transferred to the acquiring utility.

Notwithstanding subsection (f) of this section, the commission may authorize the construction of segments of a transmission line before right-of-way is acquired for an entire transmission line provided that:

The public utility has satisfied all requirements for the issuance of a certificate except subsection (f) of this section;

The public utility has obtained all required right-of-way within the authorized segment;

Authorization to construct the transmission line within the authorized segment shall not exceed ten (10) miles from the advancing end of an authorized segment, provided that the commission may waive the ten (10) mile limitation if the transmission line segment is:

Located entirely between substations or switching stations;

Located between a substation or switching station and the state line; or

Located entirely within state or federal land.

Notice has been provided to all private property owners along the entire length of the proposed transmission line;

The commission provides an opportunity for private property owners who are adversely affected by the location of the segment an opportunity to be heard before the authorization of a segment concerning the location of the segment or the impact of any future extension of the transmission line.

Unless otherwise determined by the commission, issuance of a certificate of convenience and necessity shall not confer the right to recover a specific amount of the costs of the construction or purchase in rates charged to Wyoming customers. Actual costs of the construction or purchase may be considered by the commission in a separate rate case determination.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 45; C.S. 1920, § 5497; R.S. 1931, § 94-145; Laws 1937, ch. 28, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 64-304; W.S. 1957, § 37-31; Laws 1977, ch. 74, § 1; 1989, ch. 198, § 1; 2009, ch. 202, § 1; 2019 ch. 6, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to certificate to operate local exchange services see §

37-15-201

.

For provisions relating to certificates of convenience and necessity generally, see §

31-18-209

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (h).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), added “Except as provided in this subsection,” and “or complete the purchase,” substituted “line or plant” for “line, plant or system,” and “line or material addition to a plant,” for “line, plant or system,” added “or purchase” following “construction” in the first sentence, substituted “line or plant” for “line, plant or system” throughout with some variation, and added the last sentence; and added (j).

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “[t]his act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See note at §

37-2-110

.

Regulation is reasonable exercise of police power. —

Statute regulating transportation companies is reasonable exercise of police power not impairing contract as to certificate of convenience and necessity granted carrier. Salt Creek Transp. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 37 Wyo. 488, 263 P. 621,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1928).

Applicability of statute. —

In granting a telecommunications company's application for a concurrent certificate of public convenience and necessity to provide local telecommunications exchange services, the Wyoming Public Service Commission appropriately concluded that subsection (a) was not applicable because the legislature intended that this section apply to situations wherein a utility contemplated construction or the extension of a line, plant, or system; in this instance, the company merely requested that it be allowed to provide additional concurrent services with the current local exchange carriers on those lines which already existed in the area. RT Communs., Inc. v. PSC, 2003 WY 145, 79 P.3d 36,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2003).

Effect of amendment. —

Amendment of Sales Tax Act, §

39-6-401

et seq. [repealed], in 1941 did not affect question as to whether or not rural electric companies are public utilities since intent of legislature, must be gathered in main, if not entirely, from act as it was originally passed. Rural Elec. Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 57 Wyo. 451, 120 P.2d 741,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 57 Wyo. 451, 120 P.2d 741,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1942).

Mutual companies. —

This section clearly recognizes that a corporation which operates electric plant for mutual benefit of its members, and not for profit, may be a public utility. Rural Elec. Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 57 Wyo. 451, 120 P.2d 741,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 57 Wyo. 451, 120 P.2d 741,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1942).

Regulation of radio common carriers not preempted by federalcommunication commission. —

The commission has jurisdiction to regulate radio common carriers, and the exercise of such jurisdiction is not preempted by the federal communication commission since the carriers could comply with both the public service commission's and the federal communication commission's rules and regulations. In re Appeal of Williams, 626 P.2d 564,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 320

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 454 U.S. 896, 102 S. Ct. 394, 70 L. Ed. 2d 211, 1981 U.S. LEXIS 3948 (U.S. 1981).

Commission does not have power to cap price of telephone exchange.—

The statutory scheme that creates and empowers the Public Service Commission does not grant the Commission the power to cap the price of a telephone exchange at 1.7 times the net book value of the telephone exchange. Tri County Tel. Ass'n v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 910 P.2d 1359,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1996).

Commission may not attach conditions precedent. —

Subsection (c) empowers the Commission to condition certificates that have already been issued, but does not empower the Commission to attach conditions precedent. Tri County Tel. Ass'n v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 910 P.2d 1359,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1996).

Financial ability. —

Under this section it seems to be duty of commission to be satisfied of financial ability of applicant before issuing certificate of necessity. In re Sheridan County Power Dist., 61 Wyo. 365, 157 P.2d 997,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1945).

Applicant for certificate of public convenience and necessity showed required financial ability, where it provided cost of service study ordered by commission, which included a balance sheet, income statement, statement of cash flows, statement of operating revenues, and other documents, and applicant's controller testified that no external financing would be required and that it had resources to operate as well as fund foreseeable expansion. Williston Basin Interstate Pipeline Co. v. Wyoming PSC, 996 P.2d 663,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2000).

The public interest is to be given paramount consideration.

Big Horn Rural Elec. Co. v. Pacific Power & Light Co., 397 P.2d 455,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1964); Telstar Communications, Inc. v. Rule Radiophone Serv., Inc., 621 P.2d 241,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 328

(Wyo. 1980).

Requirement of “public hearing” fulfilled. —

Hearings on a long distance telephone company's complaint fulfilled the requirement of a “public hearing,” where extensive hearings were held, notice was given of the hearings, and the requisite opportunity to cross-examine and to produce witnesses was provided. Union Tel. Co. v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 821 P.2d 550,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1991).

The desires of the utilities are secondary.

Big Horn Rural Elec. Co. v. Pacific Power & Light Co., 397 P.2d 455,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1964); Telstar Communications, Inc. v. Rule Radiophone Serv., Inc., 621 P.2d 241,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 328

(Wyo. 1980).

The commission is empowered to amend certificates of public convenience and necessity.

In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

Amendments may be effected by arbitration. —

The commission, keeping in mind the paramount public interest, may effect amendments to certificates of convenience and necessity upon agreement of the parties involved, and there is nothing inherently wrong in solving the matter by arbitration. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

This section contemplates a mutual adjustment of rights between two public service utilities

under the jurisdiction of the commission with facilities already existing, authorized or constructed. Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. Gillette, 525 P.2d 3,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1974).

Subsection (a) of this section anticipates that more than one system can coexist in one area under such terms as may be “just and reasonable.” Telstar Communications, Inc. v. Rule Radiophone Serv., Inc., 621 P.2d 241,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 328

(Wyo. 1980).

No jurisdiction to adjudicate rights between city and utility.—

Courts, rather than the public service commission, have jurisdiction to adjudicate rights between city and public utility in contract dispute between them. Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. Gillette, 525 P.2d 3,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1974).

Certificate of convenience and necessity not required fromnon-public utility company. —

In a condemnation case under Wyo. Const. art. I, § 32 and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-26-815

, by a power company, a certificate of convenience and necessity under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

37-2-205

and

1-26-816

was not required because the company was not a ‘public utility’ as defined by Wyo. Stat. Ann § 37-1-101(a)(vi) in that the company supplied wholesale power to an energy corporation that in turn sold it to its members. Bridle Bit Ranch Co. v. Basin Elec. Power Coop., 2005 WY 108, 118 P.3d 996,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 2005).

Balancing effects of new service on existing service. —

The fact that a new service may have some effect of additional facilities; incidental disadvantages are simply weighed in balance against ultimate public advantages. Telstar Communications, Inc. v. Rule Radiophone Serv., Inc., 621 P.2d 241,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 328

(Wyo. 1980).

Necessity of additional service. —

Applicant for certificate of public convenience and necessity presented sufficient evidence that construction of additional pipeline was not duplicative and was in best interest of community. Williston Basin Interstate Pipeline Co. v. Wyoming PSC, 996 P.2d 663,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2000).

Good faith. —

There was nothing unconscionable in a company trying to buy products at a better price or win over customers from a competitor, and applicant's decision to build pipeline to ensure a reliable supply of gas at reasonable prices was sufficient credible evidence of applicant's good faith. Williston Basin Interstate Pipeline Co. v. Wyoming PSC, 996 P.2d 663,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2000).

Purpose of authority of commission

is to secure to the public all the advantages of competition in obtaining fair rates and good service and to protect the public from its disadvantages. Telstar Communications, Inc. v. Rule Radiophone Serv., Inc., 621 P.2d 241,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 328

(Wyo. 1980).

Utility may serve plant located on boundary of certificatedarea of another utility. —

The commission did not err in determining that public convenience and necessity would be best served by authorizing a public utility to serve the entire plant located on the boundary of the certificated area of another utility. Further, an abuse of discretion did not occur in the refusal by the commission to rehear this matter, the newly discovered evidence upon which the unsuccessful utility contended for a rehearing consisting of newspaper clippings relating to a “possible” expansion of the plant, and not to a present intent to expand the plant. Utah Power & Light Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 713 P.2d 240,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 463

(Wyo. 1986).

Sale of gas to uncertificated territory prohibited. —

The commission did not exceed its jurisdiction in prohibiting a gas company from selling, within its certificated territory, gas to an oil company, which transported the gas and utilized it in another gas company's certificated territory. Cody Gas Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 748 P.2d 1144,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1988).

The commission has continuing jurisdiction,

and if it should develop that the rates proposed are unjust and unreasonable, the matter can be adjusted without too much difficulty in a proper proceeding before the commission. Big Horn Rural Elec. Co. v. Pacific Power & Light Co., 397 P.2d 455,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1964).

There is always some uncertainty in projecting proposals into the future,

as the commission is required to do in the light of its experience. Big Horn Rural Elec. Co. v. Pacific Power & Light Co., 397 P.2d 455,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1964).

Discretion of commission is broad. —

The discretion vested in the commission by this section is broad indeed when no vested rights are involved. Big Horn Rural Elec. Co. v. Pacific Power & Light Co., 397 P.2d 455,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1964).

Discretion in case of untimely applications. —

Despite untimeliness of application, public service commission may grant a certificate of public convenience and necessity, and may impose sanctions or not, at its discretion, if application is acceptable in all other respects. Williston Basin Interstate Pipeline Co. v. Wyoming PSC, 996 P.2d 663,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2000).

Commission's discretion not subject to review unless abused.—

It is not the function of the courts to try the controversy anew and the courts will not substitute their judgment and discretion for that of the commission unless abuse is shown or there is a showing of capricious, unreasonable, or arbitrary action. Big Horn Rural Elec. Co. v. Pacific Power & Light Co., 397 P.2d 455,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1964).

The supreme court of Wyoming will not substitute its judgment for that of the commission if the commission's decision is supported by substantial evidence. Telstar Communications, Inc. v. Rule Radiophone Serv., Inc., 621 P.2d 241,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 328

(Wyo. 1980).

City immune from antitrust liability for denying franchise.—

Under the “state action” doctrine as applied to the laws of the state, the city was immune from antitrust liability for denying plaintiff a franchise for electric service within the city while granting defendant a monopoly. Rural Electric Co. v. Cheyenne Light, Fuel & Power Co., 602 F. Supp. 105, 1983 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 18645 (D. Wyo. 1983), aff'd, 762 F.2d 847, 1985 U.S. App. LEXIS 31246 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1985).

Immunity of commission. —

An antitrust action by a power company against another power company and a municipality, following the issuance by the public service commission to the defendant-power company of a nonexclusive franchise to serve the municipality, alleging an anticompetitive conspiracy to keep the plaintiff-power company out of the municipality, was dismissed under the “state action” immunity doctrine. Rural Electric Co. v. Cheyenne Light, Fuel & Power Co., 762 F.2d 847, 1985 U.S. App. LEXIS 31246 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1985).

Applicant should reject unacceptable certificates when tendered.—

The commission under this section was authorized to impose just and reasonable conditions, and if the certificate in the form tendered was not acceptable to applicant it should have been rejected and further steps taken at that time to have it clarified. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

Weight of evidence. —

There is no rule of law as to the weight to be given by the commission to the various elements considered in arriving at its decision, this is for the commission to decide, unless it can be shown that its actions were arbitrary, capricious, or unreasonable. Big Horn Rural Elec. Co. v. Pacific Power & Light Co., 397 P.2d 455,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1964).

It is for the commission to resolve conflicts in testimony since the subject matter is technical, calling for aid of the experts, and the opinions are to be weighed and considered by a tribunal experienced in such matters. Big Horn Rural Elec. Co. v. Pacific Power & Light Co., 397 P.2d 455,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1964).

The ultimate weight to be given evidence before the commission as a trier of fact is to be determined by that agency in the light of the expertise and experience of its members in such matters. Telstar Communications, Inc. v. Rule Radiophone Serv., Inc., 621 P.2d 241,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 328

(Wyo. 1980).

Applied

in

Dubois Tel. Exch. v. Mountain States Tel. & Tel. Co., 429 P.2d 812,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1967); Continental Pipe Line Co. v. Belle Fourche Pipeline Co., 372 F. Supp. 1333, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9294 (D. Wyo. 1974); Western Radio Communications, Inc. v. Two-Way Radio Serv., Inc., 718 P.2d 15,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 538

(Wyo. 1986); Montana-Dakota Utils. Co. v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 746 P.2d 1272,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 559

(Wyo. 1987).

Quoted

in

Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. City of Gillette, 584 P.2d 995,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1978).

Cited

in

Delaware, L. & W. R. Co. v. Morristown, 276 U.S. 182, 48 S. Ct. 276, 72 L. Ed. 523, 1928 U.S. LEXIS 72, 56 A.L.R. 756 (1928); Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(1929).

Law reviews. —

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).

§ 37-2-205.1.
Nonsitus certificate of public convenience and necessity.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section and unless otherwise waived by the commission, no public utility shall begin construction or complete the purchase of a line or plant, or of any extension of a line or material addition to a plant, outside the state of Wyoming without having first obtained from the commission a nonsitus certificate of public convenience and necessity determining that the present or future need for the nonsitus resource is prudent and in the public interest.

A certificate shall only be required under this section if:

The nonsitus resource is intended by the public utility to be a capital investment in a plant on which return is earned in Wyoming; and

The capital investment in the nonsitus resource exceeds one percent (1%) of the total capital investment in the plant on which return is earned, that is assigned or allocated to Wyoming customers, based on the public utility’s most recent general rate case determination.

No public utility shall include a capital investment in a nonsitus resource in rates charged to Wyoming customers without having first obtained from the commission a nonsitus certificate of public convenience and necessity pursuant to this section.

Unless otherwise determined by the commission, issuance of a nonsitus certificate of public convenience and necessity shall not confer the right to recover a specific amount of the costs of the nonsitus resource in rates charged to Wyoming customers. Actual costs of the capital investment may be considered by the commission in a separate rate case determination.

As used in this section:

“Nonsitus resource” means construction or complete the purchase of a line or plant, or of any extension of a line or material addition to a plant, outside the state of Wyoming;

“Public utility” shall not include any cooperative electric utility as defined in W.S. 37-17-101(a)(i) that is exempt from public service commission retail rate regulation.

History.

2019 ch. 6, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 6, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 37-2-206.
Powers of commission; court to compel obedience to lawful orders.

The commission, commissioner or commission employee acting in the capacity of a hearing officer for the purpose mentioned in W.S.

37-1-101

through

37-3-114

, and

37-12-201

through

37-12-213

, may administer oaths, certify to official acts, issue subpoenas, compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents and testimony. If any person fails to comply with any lawful order of the commission, commissioner or commission employee acting in the capacity of a hearing officer, or any subpoena, or if any witness refuses to testify to any matter regarding which he may be interrogated lawfully, the district court of any county on application of the commission, a commissioner or commission employee acting in the capacity of a hearing officer, shall compel obedience by attachment proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from the court or a refusal to testify therein.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 46; C.S. 1920, § 5498; R.S. 1931, § 94-146; C.S. 1945, § 64-305; W.S. 1957, § 37-32; Laws 1977, ch. 139, § 1; 2007, ch. 215, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to penalty for hindering investigations, see §

37-12-206

.

The 2007 amendment

substituted “37-1-101 through

37-3-114

” for “37-1 through 37-64” and substituted “37-12-201 through

37-12-213

” for “37-260 through 37-272.”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2007.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 37-2-207.
Attendance of witnesses, production of books.

Any party to a proceeding before the commission with the consent of the commission shall have process to enforce the attendance of witnesses, and the production of books, papers, maps, contracts, reports and records of every description affecting the subject matter of the investigation.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 47; C.S. 1920, § 5499; R.S. 1931, § 94-147; C.S. 1945, § 64-306; W.S. 1957, § 37-33.

Examination of books. —

Protestant against increased rates by transportation company is entitled to inspect and examine books of company; however, notice to produce books should be given and notice given at trial is ordinarily not sufficient, unless desired papers are readily accessible and no delay in trial will result. Gore v. John, 61 Wyo. 246, 157 P.2d 552,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1945).

Production of books. —

Although request for production of company's books is not made until time of hearing on question of increasing bus fares, request should be granted where books are located in town where hearing would take somewhat longer. Gore v. John, 61 Wyo. 246, 157 P.2d 552,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1945).

Reports, testing accuracy. —

Protestant as to rates should be permitted to test accuracy of transportation company's reports, just as commission has right to do, even though reports to commission are made under oath. Gore v. John, 61 Wyo. 246, 157 P.2d 552,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1945).

§ 37-2-208.
Witness fees.

Witnesses who are summoned before the commission shall be paid the same fees and mileage that are paid to witnesses in the district courts of this state. Witnesses whose depositions are taken pursuant to the provisions of this act and the magistrate or officer taking the same shall be entitled severally to the same fees as are paid for like services in the district courts of the state. All such fees shall be paid in the first instance by the party requesting the process and shall be taxed the same as costs and included in the order of the commission.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 48; C.S. 1920, § 5500; R.S. 1931, § 94-148; C.S. 1945, § 64-307; W.S. 1957, § 37-34.

Cross references. —

As to witness fees, see §

1-14-102

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See note at §

37-2-110

.